Illinois, session 104th, SB55.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 21of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 22must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 23370c, and 370c.1, and 370c.3 and Article XXXIIB of the   SB0055- 2 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits shall 2provide the coverage required under Section 356m of the 3Illinois Insurance Code and, for the employees of the State 4Employee Group Insurance Program only, the coverage as also 5provided in Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of 6Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section with 7respect to Sections 370c, and 370c.1, and 370c.3 of the 8Illinois Insurance Code; all other requirements of this 9Section shall be enforced by the Department of Central 10Management Services.11    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 12any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 13with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 15Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 16whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 191-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 20eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 21102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 221-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 258-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 26eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25;   SB0055- 3 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 21-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 3    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 4Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 5    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)6    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 7including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 8of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 9coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 10benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 11health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 12under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 13356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 14356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 15356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 16356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 17356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 18356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 19356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 20The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 21356z.19, and 370c, and 370c.3 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 22The Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of 23this Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered 24as provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function   SB0055- 4 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1of the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 2Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 3rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 4every provision of this Section. 5    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 6any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 7with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 8Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 9Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 10whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 12102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 131-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 14eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 15102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 161-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 17eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 197-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 20eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 21revised 11-26-24.) 22    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 23changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 24    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)  SB0055- 5 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 2municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 3self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 4coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 5coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 6covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 7Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 8356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 9356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 10356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 11356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 12356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 13356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 14356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 15and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 16comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c, and 17370c.3 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 18Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 19requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in 20this is an exclusive power and function of the State and is a 21denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection 22(h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule municipality to 23which this Section applies must comply with every provision of 24this Section. 25    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 26any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance   SB0055- 6 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 3Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 4whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 6102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 71-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 8eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 101-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 15revised 11-26-24.) 16    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1710-22.3f as follows: 18    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)19    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 20protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 21post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 22policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 23the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 24356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a,   SB0055- 7 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 2356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 3356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 4356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 5356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 6356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 7Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 8356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 9comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c, and 370c.3 of 10the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 11enforce the requirements of this Section. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 19102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 201-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 21eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 22102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 231-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 25103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 267-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918,   SB0055- 8 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 3adding Section 370c.3 as follows: 4    (215 ILCS 5/370c.3 new)5    Sec. 370c.3. Mental health and substance use parity.6    (a) In this Section:7    "Application" means a person's or facility's application 8to become a participating provider with an insurer in at least 9one of the insurer's provider networks.10    "Applying provider" means a provider or facility that has 11submitted a completed application to become a participating 12provider or facility with an insurer.13    "Behavioral health trainee" means any person: (1) engaged 14in the provision of mental health or substance use disorder 15clinical services as part of that person's supervised course 16of study while enrolled in a master's or doctoral psychology, 17social work, counseling, or marriage or family therapy program 18or as a postdoctoral graduate working toward licensure; and 19(2) who is working toward clinical State licensure under the 20clinical supervision of a fully licensed mental health or 21substance use disorder treatment provider.22    "Completed application" means a person's or facility's 23application to become a participating provider that has been 24submitted to the insurer and includes all the required   SB0055- 9 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1information for the application to be considered by the 2insurer according to the insurer's policies and procedures for 3verifying a provider's or facility's credentials.4    "Contracting process" means the process by which a mental 5health or substance use disorder treatment provider or 6facility makes a completed application with an insurer to 7become a participating provider with the insurer until the 8effective date of a final contract between the provider or 9facility and the insurer. "Contracting process" includes the 10process of verifying a provider's credentials.11    "Participating provider" means any mental health or 12substance use disorder treatment provider that has a contract 13to provide mental health or substance use disorder services 14with an insurer.15    (b) For all group or individual policies of accident and 16health insurance or managed care plans that are amended, 17delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or 18any contracted third party administering the behavioral health 19benefits for the insurer, reimbursement for in-network mental 20health and substance use disorder treatment services delivered 21by Illinois providers and facilities must be equal to or 22greater than 141% of the Medicare rate for the mental health or 23substance use disorder service delivered. For services not 24covered by Medicare, the reimbursement rates must be, on 25average, equal to or greater than 144% of the insurer's 26in-network reimbursement rate for such service on the   SB0055- 10 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 2Assembly. This Section applies to all covered office, 3outpatient, inpatient, and residential mental health and 4substance use disorder services. If at any time the average 5reimbursement for in-network medical or surgical services 6delivered by Illinois providers exceeds 141% of the Medicare 7rate for such services, then the reimbursement for mental 8health and substance use disorder treatment services must be 9equal to or greater than that average.10    This Section applies to all covered office, outpatient, 11inpatient, and residential mental health and substance use 12disorder services. 13    This subsection does not apply to mental health or 14substance use disorder services provided by a hospital when 15the hospital has a contract with the insurer that provides for 16reimbursement for such services based on achieving specified 17patient health outcomes and other quality measures and 18includes shared savings from lower health care costs. 19    (c) A group or individual policy of accident and health 20insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 21issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, or contracted 22third party administering the behavioral health benefits for 23the insurer, shall cover all medically necessary mental health 24or substance use disorder services received by the same 25insured on the same day from the same or different mental 26health or substance use provider or facility for both   SB0055- 11 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1outpatient and inpatient care.2    (d) A group or individual policy of accident and health 3insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 4issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, or any 5contracted third party administering the behavioral health 6benefits for the insurer, shall cover any medically necessary 7mental health or substance use disorder service provided by a 8behavioral health trainee when the trainee is working toward 9clinical State licensure and is under the supervision of a 10fully licensed mental health or substance use disorder 11treatment provider, which is a physician licensed to practice 12medicine in all its branches, licensed clinical psychologist, 13licensed clinical social worker, licensed clinical 14professional counselor, licensed marriage and family 15therapist, licensed speech-language pathologist, or other 16licensed or certified professional at a program licensed 17pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act who is engaged in 18treating mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 19disorders or conditions. Services provided by the trainee must 20be billed under the supervising clinician's rendering National 21Provider Identifier.22    (e) A group or individual policy of accident and health 23insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 24issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, or any 25contracted third party administering the behavioral health 26benefits for the insurer, shall:  SB0055- 12 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1        (1) cover medically necessary 60-minute psychotherapy 2    billed using the CPT Code 90837 for Individual Therapy;3        (2) not impose more onerous documentation requirements 4    on the provider than is required for other psychotherapy 5    CPT Codes; and6        (3) not audit the use of CPT Code 90837 any more 7    frequently than audits for the use of other psychotherapy 8    CPT Codes.9    (f)(1) Any group or individual policy of accident and 10health insurance or managed care plan that is amended, 11delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, or 12any contracted third party administering the behavioral health 13benefits for the insurer, shall complete the contracting 14process with a mental health or substance use disorder 15treatment provider or facility for becoming a participating 16provider in the insurer's network, including the verification 17of the provider's credentials, within 60 days from the date of 18a completed application to the insurer to become a 19participating provider. Nothing in this paragraph (1), 20however, presumes or establishes a contract between an insurer 21and a provider.22    (2) Any group or individual policy of accident and health 23insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 24issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, or any 25contracted third party administering the behavioral health 26benefits for the insurer, shall reimburse a participating   SB0055- 13 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1mental health or substance use disorder treatment provider or 2facility at the contracted reimbursement rate for any 3medically necessary services provided to an insured from the 4date of submission of the provider's or facility's completed 5application to become a participating provider with the 6insurer up to the effective date of the provider's contract. 7The provider's claims for such services shall be reimbursed 8only when submitted after the effective date of the provider's 9contract with the insurer. This paragraph (2) does not apply 10to a provider that does not have a completed contract with an 11insurer. If a provider opts to submit claims for medically 12necessary mental health or substance use disorder services 13pursuant to this paragraph (2), the provider must notify the 14insured following submission of the claims to the insurer that 15the services provided to the insured may be treated as 16in-network services.17    (3) Any group or individual policy of accident and health 18insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 19issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, or any 20contracted third party administering the behavioral health 21benefits for the insurer, shall cover any medically necessary 22mental health or substance use disorder service provided by a 23fully licensed mental health or substance use disorder 24treatment provider affiliated with a mental health or 25substance use disorder treatment group practice who has 26submitted a completed application to become a participating   SB0055- 14 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1provider with an insurer who is delivering services under the 2supervision of another fully licensed participating mental 3health or substance use disorder treatment provider within the 4same group practice up to the effective date of the applying 5provider's contract with the insurer as a participating 6provider. Services provided by the applying provider must be 7billed under the supervising licensed provider's rendering 8National Provider Identifier.9    (4) Upon request, an insurer, or any contracted third 10party administering the behavioral health benefits for the 11insurer, shall provide an applying provider with the insurer's 12credentialing policies and procedures. An insurer, or any 13contracted third party administering the behavioral health 14benefits for the insurer, shall post the following 15nonproprietary information on its website and make that 16information available to all applicants:17        (A) a list of the information required to be included 18    in an application;19        (B) a checklist of the materials that must be 20    submitted in the credentialing process; and21        (C) designated contact information of a network 22    representative, including a designated point of contact, 23    an email address, and a telephone number, to which an 24    applicant may address any credentialing inquiries. 25    (g) The Department has the same authority to enforce this 26Section as it has to enforce compliance with Sections 370c and   SB0055- 15 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1370c.1. Additionally, if the Department determines that an 2insurer or a contracted third party administering the 3behavioral health benefits for the insurer has violated this 4Section, the Department shall, after appropriate notice and 5opportunity for hearing in accordance with Section 402, by 6order assess a civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation. The 7Department shall establish any processes or procedures 8necessary to monitor compliance with this Section. 9    (h) At the end of 5 years, 10 years, and 15 years following 10the implementation of subsection (b) of this Section, the 11Department shall review the impact of this Section on network 12adequacy for mental health and substance use disorder 13treatment and access to affordable mental health and substance 14use care. By no later than December 31, 2033, December 31, 152038, and December 31, 2043, the Department shall submit a 16report in each of those years to the General Assembly that 17includes its analyses and findings. For the purpose of 18evaluating trends in network adequacy, the Department may 19examine out-of-network utilization and out-of-pocket costs for 20insureds for mental health and substance use treatment and 21services for all plans to compare with in-network utilization. 22    (i) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 23implement this Section by no later than May 1, 2026.24    (j) This Section does not apply to a health care plan 25serving Medicaid populations that provides, arranges for, pays 26for, or reimburses the cost of any health care service for   SB0055- 16 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1persons who are enrolled under the Illinois Public Aid Code or 2under the Children's Health Insurance Program Act.  3    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 4amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 5    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)6    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)7    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 8    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 9the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 10141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 11152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 12155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 13356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 14356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 15356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 16356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 17356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 18356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 19356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 20356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 21356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 22356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 23356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 24356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b,   SB0055- 17 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 370c.3, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 2403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 3subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 4XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 5Illinois Insurance Code.6    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 7for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 8Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 9are deemed to be "domestic companies":10        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 11    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;12        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 13    State; or14        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 15    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 16    of this State, except a corporation subject to 17    substantially the same requirements in its state of 18    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 19    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.20    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 21acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 22pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,23        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 24    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 25    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 26    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other   SB0055- 18 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1    acquisition of control takes effect;2        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 3    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 4    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 5    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 6    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 7    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 8    other acquisition of control;9        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 10    following information:11            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 12        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 13        Organization sought to be acquired;14            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 15        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 16        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 17        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 18        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 19        forma financial statements reflecting projected 20        combined operation for a period of 2 years;21            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 22        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 23        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 24        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and25            (D) such other information as the Director shall 26        require.  SB0055- 19 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 2Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 3any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 4enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 5maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 6to its health care certificates).7    (e) In considering any management contract or service 8agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 9Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 10specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 11take into account the effect of the management contract or 12service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 13and the financial condition of the health maintenance 14organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 15into account the effect of the management contract or service 16agreement on competition.17    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 18Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 19Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 20defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 21Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 22group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 23additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:24        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 25    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 26    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance   SB0055- 20 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 2    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 3    not be less than one year); and4        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 5    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 6    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 7    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 8    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 9    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 10    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 11    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 12    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 13    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 14    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 15    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 16    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 17    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 18    plan years.19    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 20statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 21describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 22and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 23the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 24to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 25profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 26unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit   SB0055- 21 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 2experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 3the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 4enrollment unit.5    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 6Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 7contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 8refund authorized under this Section.9    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 10if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 11accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 12Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 13Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 14adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 15(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 16102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 171-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 18eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 19102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 201-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 21eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 236-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 25103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 261-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751,   SB0055- 22 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 2103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 31-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 4    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)5    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 6    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 7the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 8141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 9152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 10155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 11356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 12356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 14356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 15356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 16356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 17356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 18356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 19356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 20356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 21356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 22356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 23368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 370c.3, 401, 24401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, 25paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles   SB0055- 23 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and 2XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code.3    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 4for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 5Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 6are deemed to be "domestic companies":7        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 8    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;9        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 10    State; or11        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 12    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 13    of this State, except a corporation subject to 14    substantially the same requirements in its state of 15    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 16    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.17    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 18acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 19pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,20        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 21    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 22    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 23    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 24    acquisition of control takes effect;25        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 26    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not   SB0055- 24 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 2    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 3    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 4    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 5    other acquisition of control;6        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 7    following information:8            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 9        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 10        Organization sought to be acquired;11            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 12        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 13        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 14        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 15        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 16        forma financial statements reflecting projected 17        combined operation for a period of 2 years;18            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 19        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 20        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 21        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and22            (D) such other information as the Director shall 23        require.24    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 25Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 26any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its   SB0055- 25 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 2maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 3to its health care certificates).4    (e) In considering any management contract or service 5agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 6Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 7specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 8take into account the effect of the management contract or 9service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 10and the financial condition of the health maintenance 11organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 12into account the effect of the management contract or service 13agreement on competition.14    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 15Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 16Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 17defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 18Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 19group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 20additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:21        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 22    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 23    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 24    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 25    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 26    not be less than one year); and  SB0055- 26 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 2    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 3    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 4    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 5    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 6    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 7    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 8    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 9    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 10    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 11    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 12    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 13    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 14    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 15    plan years.16    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 17statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 18describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 19and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 20the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 21to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 22profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 23unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 24or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 25experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 26the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or   SB0055- 27 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b1enrollment unit.2    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 3Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 4contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 5refund authorized under this Section.6    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 7if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 8accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 9Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 10Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 11adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 12(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 13102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 141-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 15eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 16102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 171-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 18eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 206-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 21eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 22103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 231-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 24eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 25103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 261-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised   SB0055- 28 -LRB104 05904 BAB 15935 b111-26-24.) 2    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 3changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 4that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 5represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 6not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 7made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 8Public Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.